Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.045

Forwarding of order to law enforcement agency.

(1) A copy of a Canadian domestic violence protection order filed with the clerk, an order granting recognition and enforcement, or an order denying recognition and enforcement under this chapter, shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before the next judicial day to the law enforcement agency specified in the order. An order granting or denying recognition and enforcement shall be accompanied by a copy of the related Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(2) Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall comply with the requirements of RCW 7.105.325.

[ 2021 c 215 s 84.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.